New Mexico, session 2026, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 to create new physician residency programs and positions. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. .232959.1